Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 3
RESERVES, LOANS, AND INVESTMENTS

11-105-301. Reserves against deposits.

State banks that are subject to reserve provisions of the "Federal Reserve Act" shall maintain such reserves against deposits as may be required by the "Federal Reserve Act", but, in addition thereto, the banking board may by rule impose reserve requirements that it deems prudent and sound on said banks or on state banks not subject to reserve provisions of the "Federal Reserve Act".

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1120, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-7-101 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the "Federal Reserve Act", see 12 U.S.C. § 221 et seq.

11-105-302. Loans, acceptances, investments, and letters of credit.

A state bank may make such loans, secured or unsecured, accept such drafts, make such investments, and issue such letters of credit as shall be permissible pursuant to rules promulgated by the banking board or otherwise permitted by this code. In promulgating such rules the banking board shall consider all relevant factors, including without limitation the policies set forth in section 11-101-102.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1121, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-7-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-303. Corporate powers - interest and charges.

In addition to the general corporate powers granted by this code, a state bank has the power, subject to the limitations and restrictions imposed by this code and the rules of the banking board, to lend money either upon the security of real property or personal property, or otherwise; to charge, or to receive in advance, interest therefor; and to contract for a charge for a secured or unsecured installment loan.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1121, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-7-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-105-304. Bank investments - customers' orders.

In addition to other investments, expressly authorized by this code or the rules promulgated by the banking board, a state bank may purchase:

Obligations that satisfy the requirements of this code or the rules promulgated by the banking board for loans;

Obligations of, or fully guaranteed by, the United States, a state of the United States, or the Dominion of Canada;

Obligations of the international bank for reconstruction and redevelopment;

Farm loan bonds issued by any federal land bank organized pursuant to an act of congress approved July 17, 1916, entitled: "An Act to provide capital for agricultural development, to create standard forms of investment based upon farm mortgages, to furnish a market for United States bonds, to create government depositories and financial agents for the United States, and for other purposes." and known as the "Federal Farm Loan Act", and acts amendatory thereto. Such farm loan bonds shall be accepted as security for all public deposits and in all cases where bonds are required by law to be deposited with any department or public official of this state, but this section shall not be so construed as to prohibit such moneys or deposits from being invested in such other securities provided for by law.

General obligations of a territory of the United States, a province of the Dominion of Canada, a political subdivision or instrumentality of a state or territory of the United States;

Obligations of a corporation chartered by the United States or a state thereof doing business in the United States; an authority organized under state law, an interstate compact, or by substantially identical legislation adopted by two or more states if any of the foregoing under this paragraph (f) are approved by the banking board for investment;

Revenue obligations issued to provide, enlarge, or improve electric power, gas, water, and sewer facilities by any city or town having a population of not less than two thousand people at the time of the investment, located in any state in the United States or territories thereof;

Such other obligations as the general assembly has designated or may from time to time designate as legal investments for public funds.

A state bank may invest an amount not exceeding ten percent of its capital as defined in the rules promulgated by the banking board in the stock of a corporation exclusively engaged in trust business and incorporated as a trust company under article 109 of this title, but every such investment shall be subject to prior approval of the banking board.

A state bank's investment in the stock of a safe deposit company is governed by section 11-105-501.

A state bank may purchase or sell without recourse any security, including corporate stock, upon the order of a customer and for such customer's account.

A state bank may, to the extent that banks subject to the laws of the federal government are permitted so to do and to the extent permitted by the rules of the banking board, purchase shares of stock in small business investment companies organized under Public Law No. 85-699, 85th Congress, known as the "Small Business Investment Act of 1958", and as amended, but in no event shall any state bank hold shares in small business investment companies in an amount aggregating more than three percent of the bank's capital and surplus.

No limitation or prohibition otherwise imposed by any provision of state law relating to banks shall prevent a state bank from investing not more than ten percent of the bank's capital as defined in the rules promulgated by the banking board in a bank service corporation as defined in 12 U.S.C. secs. 1861 to 1865, inclusive, and as amended, subject to the rights, powers, and limitations contained therein, and such investment by state banks is expressly authorized to the extent permitted by the rules of the banking board.

Notwithstanding any restrictions upon investments in obligations, powers, or activities contained in this code, a state bank may invest in any obligation, exercise such powers, and engage in such activities that such bank could legally acquire, exercise, and engage in were it operating as a national bank at the time such investment was made, such powers were exercised, or such activities were engaged in, to the extent permitted by the rules promulgated by the banking board.

A state bank may invest an amount not exceeding ten percent of its capital as defined in the rules promulgated by the banking board in the stock of any bank or bank holding company that provides services solely to depository institutions and their shareholders, directors, officers, and employees, wherein the ownership of stock of the bank or bank holding company, except for any stock required by law to be owned by directors of the bank or bank holding company, is restricted to banks or bank holding companies. The amount of stock owned by a state bank in any such bank or bank holding company shall not be in excess of five percent of the voting shares of such bank or bank holding company.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 11-105-102 (2), a state bank may directly engage in activities that are primarily investments in real estate or may acquire and hold the voting stock of one or more corporations the activities of which are primarily investments in real estate. Such activities may include subdividing and developing real property and building residential housing or commercial improvements on such property and may also include owning, renting, leasing, managing, operating for income, or selling such property. Investments in real estate subject to section 11-105-401 may, at the bank's option, be included in investments authorized in this subsection (9) and thereby be removed from the restrictions of section 11-105-401. Such property shall be entered on the books at not more than cost or fair market value, whichever is less, but without any charge off as required under section 11-105-401 (1)(d). The total of all investments made by a state bank pursuant to the authority of this subsection (9), including any loans and guarantees made by the bank on such property or made to or for the benefit of corporations the stock of which it holds pursuant to the authority of this subsection (9), shall not exceed ten percent of its total assets. The authority provided in this subsection (9) is in addition to investment in fixed assets of the bank pursuant to section 11-105-402.

Upon finding that such restrictions are necessary according to the criteria set forth in section 11-102-105 and the policies set forth in section 11-101-102, the banking board may adopt rules that restrict the total investments of a state bank under this subsection (9) to a percentage less than ten percent of the bank's total assets. Nothing in this subsection (9) shall authorize a state bank to contravene a lawful order of the banking board or commissioner with respect to investments by the state bank in real estate or corporations engaging in real estate activities. A state bank that intends to initiate a program of investments under the authority of this subsection (9) shall give sixty days' advance notice to the division of such intent; except that such notice may be waived in the banking board's discretion where such notice is impracticable or unnecessary. The state bank shall also notify the division within ten days after the commencement of the investment program. If similar notices are required by the bank's federal supervisory agency, the same form of notice may be used for purposes of notice under this subsection (9).

A state bank may invest in the securities of, or other interests in, any open-end and closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under the federal "Investment Company Act of 1940", 15 U.S.C. sec. 80a-1 et seq., if the portfolio of such investment company or investment trust is limited to United States government obligations that are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States government and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such obligations and if any such investment company or investment trust actually takes delivery of such collateral, either directly or through an authorized custodian.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1121, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2067, § 16, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-7-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

The "Federal Farm Loan Act", referenced in this section, was repealed in 1971 by the "Farm Credit Act of 1971", which also provided that references to the "Farm Loan Act" shall be deemed to refer to the comparable provisions of the "Farm Credit Act of 1971", Pub.L. 92-181, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.

11-105-305. Acceptances - letters of credit.

A state bank may accept:

A draft that has not more than six months' sight to run, exclusive of days of grace, and is drawn to finance the purchase of goods with maturity in accordance with the original terms of purchase, or is secured by shipping documents transferring or securing title to goods, or by receipt of a licensed or bonded warehouse or elevator transferring or securing title to readily marketable staples;

A draft that has no more than three months' sight to run, exclusive of days of grace, and is drawn by a bank outside the continental limits of the United States for the purpose of furnishing dollar exchange for trade.

A state bank may issue letters of credit, but, unless the authority conferred to draw upon the bank or its correspondents is limited to such drafts as a bank is authorized by this section to accept, the amount of the credit outstanding at any one time shall be deemed to be a loan to the person for whose account the credit was issued.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1124, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-7-107 as it existed prior to 2003.